New Jersey, session 221, S425.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No State agency, county, or municipality shall adopt any rule, regulation, or ordinance that prohibits the installation or use of a fossil fuel-powered appliance in a residential or commercial kitchen in the State, including, but not limited to, a natural gas-powered oven or stove, provided that the appliance complies with all applicable federal regulations and all applicable State regulations in effect on the effective date of this section. b.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or modify the ability of a State agency, county, municipality, or private entity to implement a program to incentivize the voluntary installation or use of an electric kitchen appliance. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.